District of Columbia statutes.
21-2001

Rule of construction; purposes.

(a)

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

(b)

The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are to:

(1)

Simplify and clarify the law concerning the affairs of missing individuals, protected individuals, and incapacitated individuals;

(2)

Promote a speedy and efficient system for managing and protecting the estates of protected individuals so that assets may be preserved for application to the needs of protected individuals and their dependents; and

(3)

Provide a system of general and limited guardianships for incapacitated individuals and coordinate guardianships and protective proceedings concerned with management and protection of estates of incapacitated individuals.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
Presumption of capacity, health care decisions, see § 21-2203.
This section is referenced in § 21-2203, § 21-2401.02, and § 21-2403.02.
1981 Ed., § 21-2001.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1-102 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).